Google 



This is a digital copy of a book that was preserved for generations on library shelves before it was carefully scanned by Google as part of a project 

to make the world's books discoverable online. 

It has survived long enough for the copyright to expire and the book to enter the public domain. A public domain book is one that was never subject 

to copyright or whose legal copyright term has expired. Whether a book is in the public domain may vary country to country. Public domain books 

are our gateways to the past, representing a wealth of history, culture and knowledge that's often difficult to discover. 

Marks, notations and other maiginalia present in the original volume will appear in this file - a reminder of this book's long journey from the 

publisher to a library and finally to you. 

Usage guidelines 

Google is proud to partner with libraries to digitize public domain materials and make them widely accessible. Public domain books belong to the 
public and we are merely their custodians. Nevertheless, this work is expensive, so in order to keep providing tliis resource, we liave taken steps to 
prevent abuse by commercial parties, including placing technical restrictions on automated querying. 
We also ask that you: 

+ Make non-commercial use of the files We designed Google Book Search for use by individuals, and we request that you use these files for 
personal, non-commercial purposes. 

+ Refrain fivm automated querying Do not send automated queries of any sort to Google's system: If you are conducting research on machine 
translation, optical character recognition or other areas where access to a large amount of text is helpful, please contact us. We encourage the 
use of public domain materials for these purposes and may be able to help. 

+ Maintain attributionTht GoogXt "watermark" you see on each file is essential for in forming people about this project and helping them find 
additional materials through Google Book Search. Please do not remove it. 

+ Keep it legal Whatever your use, remember that you are responsible for ensuring that what you are doing is legal. Do not assume that just 
because we believe a book is in the public domain for users in the United States, that the work is also in the public domain for users in other 
countries. Whether a book is still in copyright varies from country to country, and we can't offer guidance on whether any specific use of 
any specific book is allowed. Please do not assume that a book's appearance in Google Book Search means it can be used in any manner 
anywhere in the world. Copyright infringement liabili^ can be quite severe. 

About Google Book Search 

Google's mission is to organize the world's information and to make it universally accessible and useful. Google Book Search helps readers 
discover the world's books while helping authors and publishers reach new audiences. You can search through the full text of this book on the web 

at |http: //books .google .com/I 



A 



<?2ye-2_ 



V ^ 









/ 



2 "■"■"• /"/u^-te . ^ v^' i>^f^' ■■ ■■ a-^i ///> { 






. / 



t. 



f ' f C.: >. . / 



;• /'' ^ ? a 






■« 



/ V t 









/ •■ • ' r , / 



;' 



o 



' Philosophy of style : 



AN ESSAY. 



BT 

HEKBERT SPENCER, 



AUTBOB OV 



"FnWT rSINOIPLBS OF PH1I.080PHT," "SOCIAL BTATIOS,^ "BLEMSKTS OF PBTOHOLOOV* 
MXLBMBNTS OF BIOLOOT," ** EDUCATION^" ETO., KXa 



WITH NOTES BY THE EDITOJEL 



- NEW YORK: 
D. APPLETON AND COMPANY, 

649 & 651 BROADWAY. 
1872. 



^WWI 




"l^l^.lt 



1885. Jan. 21, 

Gift of 

The Hdird of 0. Q. Fdlt^t 



EntebeD) according to Act of CongresB, in the year 1871, by 

D. APPLETON & CO., 
In the Office of the Librarian of Congress, at Washington. 



- ■^ 

If we read the signs of tlie times aright, ;k'C muat 
acknowledge that this is a period of deep re^arch and 
profound meditation, when men seek to give expression 
to the laws according to which nj^tuj**, society, and 
thoaght live, msve, uid have their bcii^. It is a period 
of transition from the snperfioial philosophy of a gross 
materialism to one higher, deeper, better, because more 
spiritual, and founded on fact and Bound principles. The 
age makes grand and not altogether fraitless efforts to 
nnroll the secrets of the human mind ; it constructs the 
philosophy of history ; it contributes some precious frag- -^ 

- menta toward the philosophy of mathematics; 
present pamphlet — for we identify the auth( 
age — it expresses clearly and well a law i 
naturally flow the rules of rhetoric and good & 
We have here the first chapter of the philosop 
one. The enthusiasm with which it was we 
men grown gray in literary pursuits, on its first appear- 
ance in an English periodical, shows both its merit and its 
timeliness. 

The writer is acquainted with nothing in any language A-^ r H' 
better cal culat ed to subdue the mania for "wild and-* _^. 
^Thirling words" than the present essay, and therefore ^ 

/ recommends it to the advanced students of our colleges ^ 
/ and universities. Indeed, it can be read with profit as ^'' 
well as with pleasure by " children of a larger growth.*' 



^'' ■■"■'■ ^aj. 



,G 



y 



CONTENTS. 



PART L 

Causes of Forcb in Lanouaos which depend upon Economy op 

THE Kental Energies. 
I. The Principle op Economy applied to Words. 
IT. The Epfect of Fiouratiye Language explained . 
III. Arrangement of Minor Images in building up a 

Thought ...... 

rV. The Superiority of Poetry to Prose explained . 



PAOS 



9 

27 

34 
36 



PART IL 

Causes of FoKce in Language which depend upon Economy of 

the Mental Sensibilities . . . . .41 



. NOTES. 

A. Idiomatic Expressions . 

B. Particulars in Thought . 

C. Labyrinthine Sentences 

D. The Origin of Figuratiye Language 

E. Why Poetry pleases . 
P. Sound Criticism 

G. SPEriFic Style . 



. 49 
49 

. 50 
61 

• 53 
64 

. 64 



< 



/ 



^ 






THE PHILOSOPHY OF STYLE. 



PART L 



CAUSES *0F FORCE IN LANaTTACE WHICH DEPEND UPON 
ECONOMY OF THE MENTAL ENERGIES. 

L— THE PRINCIPLE OF ECONOMY APPLIED TO WORDS. 

COMMENTING on the seeming incongruity between 
his father's argumentative powers and his ignorance 
of formal logic, Tristram Shandy says : — " It was a matter 
of just wonder with my worthy tutor, and two or three 
fellows of that learned society, that a man who knew not 
so much as the names of his tools, should be able to work 
after that fashion with them." Sterne's inJeiMted implica- 
tion that a knowledge of the principles of reasoning 
neither makes, nor is essential to, a good reasoner, is 
doubtless true. Thus, too, is it with grammar. As Dr. 
Latham, condemning the, usual school-drill in Lindley 
Murray, rightly remarks :— " Gross vulgarity is a fault to 
be prevented ; but the proper prevention is to be got from 
habit — ^not rules.'^ Similarly, there can be little question 
that good composition is far less depend^ent upon acquaint- 
ance with its laws, than upon practice and natural apti- 
tude. A clear head, a quick imagination, and a sensitive 
ear, will go far towards making all rhetorical precepts 
needless. He who daily hears and reads well-framed 
sentences, will naturally more or less tend to use similar 
ones. And where there exists any mental idiosyncrasy— 
where there is a deficient verbal memory, or an inadequate 



V 



10 TUE PHILOSOPHY OF STILE 



iU% 






\ 



•> 



sense of logical dependence, or but little perception of 
order, or a lack of constructive ingenuity ; no amount of 
instruction will remedy the defect. Nevertheless, some 
practical result may be expected from a familiarity with 
the principles of style. The endeavour to conform to laws 
may tell, though slowly. And if in no other way, yet, 
as facilitatmg revision, a knowledge of the thing to be 
achieved — a clear idea of what constitutes a beauty, and 
what a blemish — cannot fail to be of service. 

^ t No general theory of expression seems yet to have 
^ been enunciated. The maxims contained in works on 
composition and rhetoric, are presented in an unorganized 
form. Standing as isolated dogmas — as empirical gener- 
alizations, they are neither so clearly apprehended, nor so 
, much respected, as they would be were they deduced 
/'from some simple first principlei We are told that 
^ . J " brevity is the soul of wit." We hear styles condemned 
? - as verbose or involved. Blair says that every needless 
part of a sentence " mterrupts the description and clogs 
.: t^ the image ;" and again, that " long sentences fatigue the 
^ V reader's attention." It is remarked by Lord Kaimes, that 
v : "to give the utmost force to a period, it ought, if possible, 
V* ^' to be closed with the word that makes the greatest figure." 
^ ^ That parentheses should be avoided and th^^gaxon^ords 
^^ * should be used in preference to those of Latin origin, are 
- ^ established precepts) But, however influential the truths 
thus dogmatically embodied, they would be much more 
influential if reduced to something like scientific ordina- 
tion. Li this, as in other cases, conviction will be greatly 
strengthened when we understand the why. And we may 
be sure that a compreh^sion of the general principle from 
which the I'ules of composition result, will not only bring 
them home to us with greater force, but will discover to 
us other rules of like origin. 












EcoNOMizma the reader's attention. 11 

On seeking for some clue to the law underlying these 
current maxims, we may see shadowed forth in many of 
themj the importance of economizing the reader's or hear-/ 
\er'8 attention. I To so present ideas that they may be 
apprehended with the least possible mental effort, is the 
desideratum towards which most of the rules above 
quoted point. When we condemn writing that is wordy, 
or confused, or intricate — when we praise this style as 
easy, and blame that as fatiguing, we consciously or un- 
consciously assume this desideratum as our. standard of 
judgment. Regarding language as an apparatus of sym- 
bols for the conveyance of thought, we may say that, as 
in a mechanical apparatus, the more simple and the better 
arranged its parts, the greater will be the effect produced. 
In either case, whatever force is absorbed by the machine 
is deducted from the result. A reader or listener has at 
each moment but a limited amount of mental power 
available: To recognize and interpret the symbols pre- 
sented to him, requires part of this power ; to arrange and 
combine the images suggested requires a further part ; and 
only that part which remains can be used for realizing the 
thought conveyed. Hence, the more time and attention 
it takes to receive and understand each sentence, the less 
time and attention can be given to the contained idea ; 
and the less vividly will that idea be conceived. 

How truly language must be regarded as a hindrance 
to thought, though the necessary instrument of it, we 
shall clearly perceive on remembering the comparative 
force with which simple ideas are communicated by signs. 
To say, " Leave the room," is less expressive than to point 
to the door. Placing a finger on the lips is more forcible 
than whispering, " Do not speak." A beck of the hand is 
better than, " Come here." No phrase can convey the 
idea of surprise so vividly as opening the eyes and raising 
the eyebrows. A shrug of the shoulders would lose much 



y 



\ 



12 THE rniLOSOPHY OF STTLE. 

by translation into words. Again, it may be remarked 
that when oral language is employed, the strongest effects 
are produced by interjections, which condense entire sen- 
tences into syllables. And in other cases, where custom 
allows us to express thoughts by single words, as in Be- 
vjarCy Heigho^ JPudge^ much force would be lost by ex- 
panding them into specific propositions. Hence, carrying 
out the metaphor that language is the vehicle of thought, 
there seems reason to think that in all cases the friction 
and inertia of the vehicle deduct from its efficiency ; and 
that in composition, the chief^ if not the sole thing to be 
done, is, to reduce this friction and inertia to the smallest 
possible amount. Let us then inquire whether economy 
of the recipient's attention is not the secret of effect, alike 
in the right choice and collocation of words, in the best 
arrangement of clauses in a sentence, in the proper order 
of its principal and subordinate propositions, in the judi- 
cious use of simile, metaphor, and other figures of speech, 
and even in the rlfythmical sequence of syllables. 

The greater forcibleness of Saxon English, or rather 
non-Latin English, first claims our attention. The several • 
special reasons assignable for this may all be reduced to 
the general reason— economy. The most important of 
them is early association. A child's vocabulary is almost 
wholly Saxon. He says, I have^ not I possess — I wishy 
not I desire ; he does not reflect^ he thinks ; he does not 
beg for amusement^ but for play ; he calls things nice or 
nasty y^ i\ot pleasant or disagreeable. The synonyms 
which he learns in after years, never become so closely, so 
organically connected with the ideas signified, as do these 
original words used in childhood ; and hence the associa- 
tion remains less strong. But in what does a strong I 
association between a word and an idea differ from a weak 
one ? . Simply in the greater ease and rapidity of tl: ' 
suggestive action. It can be in nothing else. Both o 



I 



1 



ECONOMIO ADVANTAGES CP SAXON WORDS. 13 



two words, if they be strictly synonymous, eventually call 
up the same image. The expression — ^It is cccid^ must in 
the end give rise to the same thought as — ^It is dOwr/,. but 
because the term acid was learnt later in life, and has not 
been so often followed by the thought symbolized, it does 
not so readily arouse that thought as the teiyn sour. If 
we remember how slowly and with what labour the 
appropriate ideas follow unfamiliar words in another lan- 
guage, and how increasing familiarity with su6h words 
brings greatar rapidity and ease of comprehension ; and 
if we consider that the same process must have gone on 
with the words of our mother tongue from childhood up- 
wards, we shall clearly see that the earliest learnt and 
oftenest used words, will, other things equal, call up 
images with less loss of time and energy than their later 
learnt synonyms.* 

The further superiority possessed by Saxon English in 
its comparative brevity, obviously comes under the same 
generalization. If it be an advantage to express an idea 
in the smallest number of words, then will it be an advan- . 
tage to express it in the smallest number of syllables. If 
circuitous phrases and needless expletives distract the 
attention and diminish the strength of the impression pro- 
duced, then do surplus articulations do so. A certain 
effort, though commonly an inappreciable one, must be 
required to recognize every vowel and consonant. If, as 
all know, it is tiresome-to4isten.ta an indistinct speaker, 
or read a badly-Wtteu manuscript ; and if, as we cannot 
doubt, the fatigue is a cumulative result of the attention 
needed to catch successive syllables; it follows that atten- 
i tion is in such cases absorbed by each syllable. And if this 
i I be true when the syllables are difficult of recognition, it 
' * will also be true, though in a less degree, when the recogni- 
tion of them is easy. Hence, the shortness of Saxon words 
becomes a reason for their greater force. /One qualification, 

* See Note A, p. 49. 



i 

\ 



^ 



f 



14 THE THILOSOPHT OF STYLE. 

however, must not be overlooked. A word which in itself 
embodies the most important part of the idea to be convey- 
ed, especially when that idea is an emdtional one, may often 
with advantage be a polysyllabic word. Thus it seems 
more forcible to say, "It is magnificent^^ than "It is 
\ \"^ Mf^^^**^ ^^^ word vast is not so powerful a one as stvr 
pendoics. Calling a thing nastT/ is not so effective as call- 
ing it disgusting. 

There seem to be several causes for this* exceptional 
superiority of certain long words. We inay ascribe it 
partly to the fact that a volu minous, mouth-filling epithet 
is, by its very size, suggestive oriargeness or strengtli; 
witiiess^the immense pomposity of sesquipedalian verbiage : 
and when great power or intensity has to be suggested, 
this association of ideas aids the effect. A further cause 
may be that a word of several syllables admits of more 
emphatic articulation; and as emphatic articulation is a 
sign of emotion, the unusual impressiveness of the thing 
named is implied by it. Yet another cause is that a long 
word (of which the latter syllables are generally inferred 
as soon as the first are spoken) allows the hearer's con- 
sciousness a longer time to dwell upon the quality pred- 
icated ; and where, as in the above cases, it is to this pred- 
icated quality that the entire attention is called, an advan- 
tage results from keeping it before the mind for an appre- 
ciable time. The reasons which we have given for pre- 
ferring short words evidently do not hold here. So that 
to make our generalization quite correct we must say, 
that while in certain sentences expressing strong feeling, 
the word which more especially implies that feeling may 

f often with advantage be a many-syllabled or Latin one; in 
the immense majority of cases, each word serving but 
as a step to the idea embodied by the whole sentence, 
should, if possible, be a one-syllabled or Saxon one. 

^ Once more, that frequent cause of strength in Saxou 






i 



t 



>ii 



/ 






f, 



■It 



'»(■ 



PKODUCTION OF VIVID IMTEESSIONS. 15 

and other primitive words— their imitative character, may 
be similarly resolved into the more general cause. Both 
those directly imitative, as splashy hang^ whiz^ roar^ &c., 
and those analogically imitative, as roug\ smooth^ Jceen^ 
blunt, thin, hard, crag, &c., have a greater or less likeness 
to the things symbolized ; and by making on the senses 
impressions allied to the ideas to be called up, they save 
part of the effort needed to call up such ideas, and leave 
more attention for the ideas themselves. 

The economy of the recipient's mental energy, into 
which are thus resolvable the several causes of the strength 
of Saxon English, may equally be traced in the superior- 
ity of specific over generic words. That concrete terms 
produce more vivid impressions than abstract ones, and 
should, when possible, be used instead, is a current max- 
im of composition. As Dr. C ampbell saySj "The moxe 
general the_terms MQ«.iEeiicitiLirc is the fainter i. the more 
special ^|^^];j3rf j ^hp byig>i^^r '' We should avoid such a 
senlenceas: 

In proportion as the manners, customs, and amuse- 
ments of a-nation are cruel and barbarous, the regulations 
of their penal code will be severe. 

And in place of it we should write : 

In proportion as men delight in battles, bull-fights, 

and combats of gladiators, will they punish by hanging, 
burning, and the rack. 

This superiority of specific expressions is clearly 4u e 
to a saving of the effort required to translate words into 
thoughts. As we do not JbhinT^iii generals but in particu- ? 
lars — as, whenever any class of things is referred to, we 
represent it to ourselves by calling to mind individual 
members of it ; it follows that when an abstract word is 
used, the hearer or reader has to choose from his stock of 
images, one or more, by which he may figure to- himself 
the genus mentioned.* In doing th^s, some delay must 

* See Note B, p. 49. 



fl 






\ 

r 

^1 



16 THE PHILOSOPHY OF STYLE. 

arise — some force be expended; and if, by employing a 
specific term, an appropriate image can be at once suggest- 
ed, an economy is achieyed, and a more vivid impression 

^l produced. 

Turning now from the choice of words to their se- 
quence, we shall find the same general priticiple hold 
. good. We have d priori reasons for believing that in 
' every sentence there is some one order of words more 
effective than any other ; and that this order is the one 
which presents the elements of Jbhfi proposition in the suc- 
cession in which they may be most readily put together. 

^ As in a narrative, the events should be stated in such se- 
quence that the mind may not have to go backwards and 
forwards in order to rightly connect them ; as in a g roup 
of sentences, the arrangement should be such, that each of 
them may be understood as it comes, without waiting 
for subsequent ones ; so in every sentence, the sequence of 
words should be that which suggests the constituents of 
the thought in the order most convenient for th^ building 
up that thought. Duly to enforce this truth, and to pre- 
pare the way for applications of it, we must briefly inquire 
into the mental act by which the meaning of a series of 
words is apprehended. 

We cannot more simply do this than by considering the 
proper -^ottocation of the substantive and adjective. Is it 
better to place the adjective before the substahtiye, or the 
substantive before the adjective ? Ought we to say with 
the French — un cheval noir / or to say as we do — a black 
horse ? Probably, most persons of culture would decide 
that one order is as good as the other. Alive to the bias 
produced by habit, they would ascribe to that the prefer- 
ence they feel for our own form of expression. They 
would expect those educated in the use of the opposite 
form to have an equal preference for that. And thus they 
would conclude that jieither of these instinctive judgments 



V . ' 



f n 

: ' , V 



LOCATION OF ADJECTIVES. 17 

is of any worth. There is, however, a philosopliical 
ground for deciding in favour of the English custom. If 
" a horse black " be the arrangement, immediately on the 
utterance of the word " horse," there arises, or tends to 
arise, in the mind, a picture answering to that word ; and 
as there has been nothing to indicate what kind of horse, 
any image of a horse suggests itself. Very likely, how- 
ever, the image will be that of a brown horse : brown 
horses being the most familiar. The result is that when 
the word "black" is added, a check is given to the pro- 
cess of thought. Either the picture of a brown horse 
already present to the imagination has to be suppressed, 
and the picture of a black one summoned in its place ; or 
else, if the picture of a brown horse be yet unformed, the 
tendency to form it has to be stopped. Whichever is the 
case, a certain amount of hindrance results. But if, on 
the other hand, " a black horse " be the expression used, 
no such mistake can be made. The word "black," indi- 
cating an abstract quality, arouses no definite idea. It 
simply prepares the mind for conceiving some object of 
that colour; and the attention is kept suspended until 
that object is known. If, then, by the precedence of the 
adjective, the idea is conveyed without liability to error, \ 
'wfhereas the precedence ;of the substantive is apt to pro- / 
duce a misconception ; it follows that the one gives the 
mind less trouble than the other, and is therefore more 
forcible. 

Possibly it will be objected that the adjective and 
substantive come so close together, that practically they 
may be considered as uttered at the same moment ; and 
that on hearing the phrase, "a horse black," there is not 
time to imagine a wrongly-coloured horse before the word 
" black " foUows to prevent it. It must be owned that it 
is not easy to decide by introspection whether- this is so 
or not. But there are facts collaterally implying that it 



/y^ 



18 THE PniLOSOPnY OF STYLE. 

13 not. Our jibility to anticipate the words yet unspoken 
is one of them. If the ideas of the hearer kept considera- 
bly behind the expressions of the speaker, as the objection 
assumes, he CQuId hardly foresee the end of a sentence by 
the tinxe it was half delivered: yet this constantly hap- 
pens. Were the supposition true, the mind, instead of 
anticipating, would be (Continually falling more and more 
Ja arrear. If the meanings of words are not realized as 
fast as the words are uttered, then the loss of time over 
each word must entail such an accumulation of delays as to 
leave a hearer entirely behind. But whether the force of 
these replies be or be not admitted, it will scarcely be denied 
that the right formation of a picture will be facilitated by 
presenting its elements in the order in which they are 
wanted ; even though the mind should do nothing until it 
has received them all. 

What is here said respecting the succession of the 
adjective and substantive is obviously applicable, by 
change of terms, to the adve rb and verb. And without 
further explanation, it will^e manifest, that in the use 
of prepositions and other particles, most language? spon- 
taneously conform with more or less completeness to this 
law. 

On applying a like analysis t<i the larger divisions of a 
sentence, we find not only that the same principle holds 
good, but that the advantage of respecting it becomes 
marked. In the arrangement of predicate and subject, for 
example, we are at once shown that as the predicate 
determines the aspect under which the subject is to be 
conceived, it should be placed first ; and the striking effect 
produced by so placing it becomes comprehensible. Take 
the often-quoted contrast between — ^*' Great is Diana of 
the Ephesian^," and — ^" Diana of the Ephesians is great." 
When the first arrangement is used, the utterance of the 
word " areat " arouses those vajnie associations of an im« 



AEEANQEMENT OF PREDICATE AND SUBJECT. 19 

pressive nature with which it has been habitually connect 
ed ; the imagination is prepared to clothe with high attri 
butes whatever follows; and when the words, "Diana of the 
Ephesians," are heard, all the appropriate imagery which 
can, on the instant, be summoned, is used in the formation of 
the picture : the mind being thus led directly, and with- 
out error, to the intended impression. When, on the con- 
trary, the reverse order is followed, the idea, " Diana of 
the Ephesians," is conceived with no special reference to 
greatness ; and when the words, " is great," are added, 
the conception has to be remodelled : whence arises a loss 
of mental energy, and a corresponding diminution of 
effect. The following verse from Coleridge's "Ancient 
Mariner," though somewhat irregular in structure, well 
ilhistrates the same truth : 

^' Alone^ alone, all, all alone, 
Alone on a wide wide sea I 
And never a saint took pity on 
My soul in agony." 

Of course thp jringplfieg[nfilly ap plies wh pn jhe pr^di. 
cate is a ver bjor a p articiple. And as effect is gained by 
placing first all. words indifiatin^he qLuality^ CQadnqt,. or 
conditio n of the subj ect, it follows that the copula also 
should have precedence. It is true, that the general habit 
of our language resists this arrangement of predicate, 
copula, and subject ; but we may readily find instances of 
the additional force gained by conforming to it. Thus in 
the li»e from " Julius Caesar" — 

" Tl^^n lurst this mighty heart," 

priority is given to a word embodying both predicate and 
copula. In a passage contained in " The Battle of Flod- 
den Field," the like order is systematically employed with 
great effect : • 



I. 
i 



n^ 



20 THE PHILOSOPHY OP STYLE. 

*^ The Border slogan rent the sky I 
A Home! a Gordon I was the crj ; 
Laitd were the clanging blows : 
Advanced^— forced bach, — now low^ now Mghj 

The pennon snnk and rose ; 
•As lends the barFs mast in the gale 
When rent are rigging, shrouds, and sail, 
It wavered 'mid the foes." 

Pursuing the principle yet' further, it is obvious thut 
for producing the greatest effect, not only should the main 
divisions of a sentence observe this sequence, but the sub- 
divisions of these should be similarly arranged. In nearly 
all cases, the predicate is accompanied by some limit or 
qualification called its complement. Com&ionly, also, the 
circumstances of the subject, which form its complement, 
have to be specified. And as these qualifications and cir- 
cumstances must determine the mode in which the acts 
and things they belong to are conceived, precedence should 
be given to them. Lord Kaimes notices the fact that this 
order is preferable; though without giving the reason. 
He says: — "When a circumstance is placed at the begin- 
ning of the period, or near the beginning, the transition 
from it to the principal subject is agreeable : is like as- 
cending or going upward." A sentence arranged in illus- 
tration of this will be desirable. Here is one : 

^Whatever it may be in theory, it is clear that m 

practice the French idea of liberty is — ^the right of every 
man to be master of the rest. 

In this case, were the first two clauses, up to the word 
"practice" inclusive, which qualify the subject, to be 
placed at the end instead of the beginning, much of the 
force would be lost ; as thus : 

^The French idea of liberty is^the right of every 

man to be matiter of the rest ; in practice at least, if not 
in theory. 



W 



\y 



OBDEB OP THE PAETS OF SENTENCES, 21 

Similarly with respect to the conditions under which' 
any fact is predicated. Observe in the following example 
the effect of putting them last : 

^How immense would be the stimulus to progress, 

were the honour now given to wealth and title given ex- 
clusively to high achievements and intrinsic worth I 

Arid then observe the superior effect of putting them 
first: 

^Were the honour now given to wealth and title 

given exclusively to high achievements and intrinsic worth, 
how immense would be the stimulus to progress ! 

The effect of giving priority to the complement of the 
predicate, as well as the predicate itself, is finely displayed 
in the opening of " Hyperion " : 

" Beefp in the 8hady sadness of a vale 
Far sunlcenfrom the healthy breath of morn, 
Far from the fiery noon and eve's one star 
Sat gray-haired Saturn, quiet as a stone," 

Here it will be observed, not only that the predicate 
" sat " precedes the subject " Saturn," and that the three 
lines in italics, constituting the complement of the predi- 
cate, come before it; btit that in the structure of that 
complement also, the same order is followed: each line 
being so arranged that the qualifying words are placed 
before the words suggesting concrete images. 

The right succession of the principal and subordinate 
propositions in a sentence manifestly depends on the same 
law. Regard for economy of the recipient's attention, 
which, as we find, determines the best order for the sub- 
ject, copula, predicate, and their complements, dictates 
that t he sub ordinate J)roposition shall precede the. priijcir 
pal one, wheSPthe sentence includes two. Containing, as 
thTsSbordinate proposition does, some qualifying or ex- 
planatory idea, its priority prevents misconception of the 



J 



22 THE PHILOSOPHY OF STYLE. 

principal one ; and thercfore^saves tlie mental effort needed 
to correct such misco nceptio n,^ This will be seen in the 
annexed example. 

* The secresy once maintained in respect to the par- 
liamentary debates, is still thought needful in diplomacy ; 
and in virtue of this secret diplomacy, England may any 
day be unawares betrayed by its ministers into a war cost- 
ing a hundred thousand lives, and hundreds of millions of 
treasure: yet the English pique themselves on being a 
self-governed people. 

The two subordinate propositions, ending with the 
semicolon and colon respectively, almost wholly determine 
the meaning of the principal proposition with which it 
concludes ; and the effect would be lost were they placed 
last instead of first. 

The general principle of right arrangement in sen- 
tences, which we have traced in its application to the lead- 
ing divisions of them, equally determines the proper order 
of their minor divisions. In every sentence of any com- 
plexity the complement to the subject contains several 
clauses, and that to the predicate several others; and 
these may be arranged in greater or less conformity to the 
law qf f 5^ ,py Qpprf( ^*^^si on. Of course with these, as witH 
the larger members, the succession should be from the less 
specific to the more specific — from the abstract to the con- 
crete. 

Now, however, we must notice a ftirther condition to 
be fulfilled in the proper construction of a sentence ; but 
still a condition dictated by the same general principle 
with the other : the condition, namely, t^atJihe_words^iid 
expressio nsmost nearly re lated in jJioughLfehalOie brought 
t h r"Tfrin r nt_tn^rthrri Evidently the single words, the 
mmor clauses, and the leading divisions of every proposi- 
tion, severally qualify each other. The longer the time 
that elapses between the mention of any qualifying mem- 



_? J 1 




V 



^. ^ 



1 
I 

i 



CX)MBmmG THE MEMBERS OF A SENTENCE. 23 



bcr and the member qualified, the longer must the^mind 
be exerted iiL-CJ«Tying forward the„.qua^ member 

readjjforjise. And the more num erous the qualifications 
to be simulta£eously^-i«me]mbered and rightly applied, 
the greater will be the mental power "expended, and the 
smaller the effect produced;^- Henee, other things equal, ) 
force wiiri5e gained by so arranging the members of a 
sentence that these suspensions shall at any moment be ' 
the fewest in number ; and shall also be of the shortest j 
duration.* The following is an instance of defective com- f 
bination : 

^A modem newspaper-statement, though probably 

true, would be laughed at, if quoted in a book as testi- 
mony ; but the letter of a court gossip is thought good 
historical evidence, if written some centuries ago. 

A rearrangement of this, in accordance with the prin- 
ciple indicated above, will be found to increase the effect. 
Thus : 

^Though probably true, a modern newspaper-state- 
ment quoted in a book as testimony, would be laughed 
at ; but the letter of a court gossip, if written some cen- 
turies ago, is thought good historical evidence. 

By making this change, some of the suspensions are 
avoided and otters shortened ; while there is less liability 
to produce premature conceptions. The passage quoted 
below from " Paradise Lost '* affords a fine instance of a 
sentence well arranged ; alike in the priority of the sub- 
ordinate members, in the avoidance of long and numerous 
suspensions, and. in the correspondence between the order 
of the clauses sind the sequence of the phenomefRt de- 
scribed, which, by the way, is a further prerequisite to 
easy comprehension, and therefore to effect. 

** As when a prowling wolf, 
Whom hunger drives to seek new haunt for prey, 

♦ See Note C, p. 50. 



24 THE PHILOSOPnT OF STYLE. 

Watching where shepherds pen their flocks at evo 
In hurdled cotes amid the field secure, 
Leaps o^er the fence with ease into the fold : 
Or as a thief bent to unhoard the cash 
Of some rich burgher, whose substantial doors, 
Oross-barr'd, and bolted fast, fear no assault, 
In at the window climbs, or o'er the tiles : 
So clomb the first grand thief into God^s fold ; 
So since into his church lewd hirelings climb." 

The habitual use of sentences in which all or most of 
the descriptive and limiting elements precede those de- 
^scribed and limited, gives rise to what is called the in- 
vertedjtyle : a title which is, howevei7l5y^no means con- 
fineSfto this structure, but is often used where the order 
of the words is simply imusuaL A more appropriate title 
would be the direct st^ Ie, as contrasted with the other, or 
indirect style: the peculiarity of the one being, that it 
conveys each thought into the mind step by step with lit- 
tle liability to error ; and of the other, that it gets the 
right thought conceived by a series of approximations. 

The superiority of the direct ovep the indirect form of 
sentence, implied by the several conclusions that have 
been drawn, must not, however, be affirmed without res- 
ervation. Though, up to a certain point, it is well for the 
qualifying clauses of a period to precede those qualified ; 
yet, as carrying forward each qualifying clause costs some 
mental effort, it follows that when the number of them 
and the time they are carried become great, we reach a 
limit beyond which more is lost than is gained. Other 
things equal, the arrangement should be such that no con- 
crete image shall be suggested until the materials out of 
which it is to be made have been presented. And yet, as 
lately pointed out, other things equal, the fewer the ma- 
\ tcrials to be held at once, and the shorter the distance 
Nithey have to be borne, the better. Hence in some cases 



MUST VARY WITH THE MIND ADDEE8SED. 25 

'it becomes a question whether most mental effort will be 
entailed by the many and long suspensions, <w by the cor- 
rection of successive misconceptions. 

"This question may sometimes be decided by consider- 
ing the capacity of the persons addressed. A greater 
grasp of mind is required for the ready comprehension of 
thoughts expressed in the direct manner, where the sen- 
tences are anywise intricate. To recollect a number of 
preliminaries stated in elucidation of a coming idea, and 
to apply them all ta the formation of it when suggested, 
demands a good memory and considerable power of con- 
centration. To one possessing these^ the direct method 
willinostly seem the best ; while to one deficient in them 
it will seem the worst. Just as it may cost a strong naan 
less effort to carry a hundred-weight from place to place 
at once^ than by a stone at a time ; so, to an active mind 
it may be easier to bear along all the qualifications of a^ 
idea and at once rightly form it when named, thantto first 
imperfectly conceivejsuch idea, and then carry back to it, 
one by one, the details and limitations afterwards men- 
tioned. While conversely, as for a boy the only possible 
mode of transferring a hundred-weight, is that of taking 
it in portions ; so, for a weak mind, the only possible mode 
of forming a compound conception may be that of build- 
ing it up by carrying separately its several parts. . 

That the mdirect method — ^the method of conveying 
the meaning by a series of approximations — ^is best fitted 
for the imcultivated, may indeed"T)e inferred from then* 
habitual use of it. The form of expression adopted by 
the savage, as in — " Water, give me," is the simplest type 
of the approximate arrangement. In pleonasms, which 
are comparatively prevalent among the uneducated, the 
game essential structure is seen ; as, for instance, in — " The 
men, they were there." Again, the old possessive case — 
"The king, his crown," conforms to the like order of 

2 




26 THE PHILOSOPHY OF STYLE. 

thouglit. MoreoTcr, the fact that the indirect mode it 
called the natural one, implies that it is the one sponta- 
neously employed by the common people: that is — ^the 
one easiest for imdisciplined minds. 

There are many cases, however, in which neither the 
direct nor the indirect structure is the best ; but where an 
intermediate structure is preferable to both. When the 
number of circumstances and qualifications to be included 
in the sentence is great, the most judicious course is nei- 
ther to enumerate them all before introducing the idea to 
which they belong, nor to put this idea first and let it be 
remodelled to agree with the particulars afterwards men- 
tioned; but to do a little of each. Take a case. It is 
desirable to avoid so extremely indirect an arrangement 
as the following : 

" We came to our journey's end, at last, with no 

small difficulty, after much fatigue, through deep roads, 
and bad weather." 

Yet to transform this into an entirely -^i^irect sentence 
would not produce a satisfactory effect ; as witness : — 

^At last, with no small difficulty, after much fa- 
tigue, through deep roads, and bad weather, we came to 
our journey's end. 

Dr. Whately, from whom we quote the first of these 
two arrangements, proposes this construction : — 

" At last, after much fatigue, through deep roads 

and bad weather, we came, with no small difficulty, to our 
journey's end." 

Here it will be observed that by introducing the words 
" we came " a little earlier in the sentence, the labour of 
carrying forward so many particulars is diminished, and 
the subsequent qualification "with no small difficulty" 
entails an addition to the thought that is very easily made. 
But a further improvement may be produced by intro- 
ducing the words " we came" still earlier; especially if at 



i 



THE ABSTRAGT SHOULD FSEOEDE THE CONGBETE. 27 

the same time the qualifications be rearranged in conform- 
ity with the principle already explained, that the more 
abstract elements of the thought should come before the 
more concrete. Observe the better effect obtained by 
making these two changes : 

At last, with no small difficulty,"and after much 

fatigue^ we came, through deep xos^da and bad weather, to 
our journey's end. 

This reads with comparative smoothness; that is — 
with less hindrance from suspensions and reconstructions 
of thought — ^with less mental effort. 

Before dismissing this branch of our subject, it should 
be further remarked, that even when addressing the most 
vigorous intellects, the direct style is unfit for communi- 
cating ideas of a complex or abstract character. So long 
as the mind has not much to do, it may be well able to 
grasp aU the preparatory clauses of a sentence, and to use 
them effectively ; but if some subtlety in the argument 
absorb the attention — ^if every faculty be strained in en- 
deavouring to catch the speaker's or writer's drift, it may 
happen that the mind, unable to cany on both processes 
at once, will break down, and allow the elements of the 
thought to lapse into confusion. 

n.— THE EFFECT OF FIGURATIVE LANGUAGE EXPLAINED 

Turning now to consider figures of speech, we may 
equally discern the same general law of effect. Underlying 
aU the rules given for the choice and right use of them, 
we shall find the same fundamental requirement — economy i 
of attention. It is indeed chiefly because they so well[ 
subserve this requirement, that figures of speech are em- 
ployed. To bring the mind more easily to the desired 



s 



38 THE PHILOSOPHY OP STYLE. 

conception, is in many cases solely, and in all cases mainly, 
their object.* 

Let us begin with the figure called Syn ffibdofiTip, T ht> 
ad^'antage sometimes gained by putting a part for the 
whole^ is due to the more convenient, or more accurate, 
presentation of the idea. If, instead of saying " a fleet of 
ten ships," we say " a fleet of ten «az7," the picture of a 
group of vessels at sea ia more readily suggested; and is so 
because the sails constitute the most conspicuous parts of 
vessels so circumstanced : whereas the word ships would 
very likely remind us of vessels in dock. Again, to say, 
" All hands to the pumps," is better than to say, " All 
\ men to the pumps ;" as it suggests the men in the special 
attitude intended, and so saves effort. Bringing ^^gray 
hairs with sorrow to the grave," is another expression, the 
effect of which has the same cause. 

The occasional increase of force produced by Metony- 
mj may be similarly accounted for. " The low morality 
of the }>ar^'* is a phrase both more brief and significant 
than the literal one it stands for. A belief in the ultimate 
supremacy of intelligence over brute force, is conveyed in 
a more concrete, and therefore more realizable form, if we 
substitute the pen and the sword for the two abstract 
terms. To say, " Beware of drinking !" is less effective 
than to say, " Beware of the bottle /" and is so, clearly 
because it calls up a less specific image. 

The Simile is in many cases used chiefly with a view 
to ornament ; but whenever it increases the force of a pas- 
sage, it does so by being an economy. Here is an instance : 

The illusion that great men and great events came 

oftener in early times than now, is partly due to historical 
perspective. As in a range of equidistant columns, the 
furthest off look the closest ; so, the conspicuous objects, 
of the past seem more thickly clustered the more remote 
they are. 

* Soc Note D. p. 51. 



EFFECT OF FIGURES OF SPEECH. 29 

To construct by a process of literal explanation, the 
thought thus conveyed, would take many sentences ; and 
the first elements of the picture would become faint while 
the imagination was busy in adding the others. But by 
the help of a comparison all effort is saved ; the picture is 
distantly realized, and its fiill effect produced. 

Of the position of the Simile,* it needs ooly to re mark^ "p 
that what has been said respecting the order of the ad- ' 
jective and substantive, predicate and subject, principal 
and subordinate propositions, &c., is applicable here. As 
whatever qualifies should precede whatever is qualified, 
force will generally be gained by placing the simile before 
the object to which it is applied. That this arrangement 
is the best, may be seen in the following passage from the 
''' Lady of the Lake " :— 

"As wreath of snow, on mountain breast, 
Slides from the rock that gave it rest, 
Poor Ellen glided from her stay. 
And at the monarch's feet she lay." 

Inverting these couplets wiU be found to diminish the ef- 
fect considerably. There are cases, however, even where 
the simile is a simple one, in which it may with advantage 
be placed last ; as in these lines from Alexander Smith's 
" Life Drama " : — 

" I see the future stretch 
All dark and barren as a rainy sea." 

The reason for this seems to be, that so abstract an 
idea as that attaching to the word " future," does not pre- 

* Properly the term " simile " is applicable only to the entire figure, in- 
clusive of the two things compared and the comparison drawn between 
them. But as there exists no name for the illustrative member of the fig- 
ure, there seems no altematiye but to employ .^ simile '' to express this alea 
This context will in each case show in which sense the word is used. 



30 THE PniLOSOPHY OF STYLE. 

sent itseli to the mind in any definite form ; and hence 
the subsequent arrival at the simile entails no reconstruc- 
tion of the thought. 

Such, however, are not the only cases in which this or- 
der is the most forcible. As the advantage of putting the 
simile before the object depends on its being carried for- 
ward in the mind to assist in forming an image of the ob- 
ject ; it must happen that if, from length or complexity, 
it cannot be so carried forward, the advantage is not 
gained. The annexed sonnet, by Coleridge, is defective 
&om this cause : 

" As when a child, on some long winter's night, 
Affrighted, clinging to its grandam's knees, 
With eager wondering and perturb'd delight 
Listens strange tales of fearful dark decrees, 
Mutter'd to wretch by necromantic spell ; 
Or of those hags who at the witching time 
Of murky midnight, ride the air sublime, 
And mingle foul embrace with fiends of hell ; 
Cold horror drinks its blood I Anon the tear 
More gentle starts, to hear the beldame tell 
Of pretty babes, that lov'd each other dear, 
Murder'd by cruel unde's mandate fell : 
Ev'n such the shiv'ring joys thy ton6s impart, 
Ev'n so, thou, Siddons, meltest my sad heart." 

Here, from the lapse of time and accumulation of cir- 
cuqistances, the first part of the comparison. is forgotten 
before its application is reached ; and requires re-reading. 
Had the main idea been first mentioned, less eflfbrt would 
have been required to retain it, and to modify the concep- 
tion of it into harmony with the comparison, than to re- 
member the comparison, and refer back to its successive 
features for help in forming the final image. 

The superiority of the Metaphor to the Simile is as- 
cribed by Dr. Whately to the facT that " all men are more 



EOONOMIO EFFECT OF THE METAPHOR. 31 

gratified at catching the resemblance for themselves, than 
in having it pointed out to them." But after what has 
been said, the great economy it achieves will seem the 
more probable cause. Lear's exclamation — 

" Ingratitude ! thou marble-nearted fiend," 
would lose part of its effect were it changed into — 

" Ingratitude I thou fiend with heart like marble ;" 

and the loss would result partly firom the position of tho 
Binule and partly from the extra number of words required. 
"When the comparison is an involved one, the greater force 
of the metaphor, consequent on its greater brevity, be- 
comes much more conspicuous. If, drawing an analogy 
between mental and physical phenomena, we say, 

^As, in passing through the crystal, beams of white 

light are decomposed into the colours of the rainbow ; so, 
in traversing the soul of the poet, the colourless rays of 

truth are transformed into brightly-tinted poetry ; 

it is dear that in receiving the double set of words ex- 
pressing the two halves of the comparison, and in carry- 
ing the one half to the other, considerable attention is 
absorbed. Most of this is saved, however, by putting the 
comparison in a metaphorical form, thus : 

^The white light of truth, in traversing the many- 
sided transparent soul of the poet, is refracted intD iiis- 
hued poetry. 

How much is conveyed in a few words by the help of 
the Metaphor, and how vivid the effect consequently pro- 
duced, may be abimdantly exemplified. From " A Life 
Drama " may be quoted the phrase, 

" I spear'd him with a jest," 

as a fine instance among the many which that poem con- 
tains. A passage in the " Prometheus Unbound," of Shel- 



32 THE PHILOSOPnY OF STYI^, 

ley, displays the power of the metaphor to great advan- 
tage : 

'^ Methought among the lawns together 
AVe wandered,. underneath the young gray dawn, 
And multitudes of dense white fleecy clouds 
Were wandering la thick flocks along the mountains 
Shepherded by the slow unwilling wind." 

This last expression is remarkable for the distinctness 
with which it realizes the features of the scene : bringmg 
the mind, as it were, by a bound to the desired conception. 

But a limit is put to the advantageous use of the Meta- 
phor, by the condition that it must be sufliciently simple 
to be understood from a hint. Evidently, if there be any 
obscurity in the meaning or application of it, no economy 
of attention will be gained; but rather the reverse. 
Hence, when the comparison is complex, it is usual to 
have recourse to the Simile. There is, however, a species 
of figure, sometimes classed imder Allegory, but which 
might, perhaps, be better called Compound Metaphor, that 
enables us to retain the brevity of the metaphorical form 
even where the analogy is intricate. This is done by indi- 
cating the applicatidh of the figure at the outset, and then 
leaving the mind to continue the paralleL Emerson has 
employed it with great eflTect in the first of his " Lectures 
on the Times " : 

" The main interest which any aspects of the Times can have 
for us, is the great spirit which gazes through them, the light 
which they can shed on the wonderful questions, "What are we, 
and Whither do we tend ? We do not wish to be deceived. Here 
we drift, like white sail across the wild ocean, now bright on the 
wave, now darkling in the trough of the sea ; but from what port 
did we sail? Who knows? Or to what port are we bound? 
Who knows ? There is no one to tell us but such poor weather- 
tossed mariners as ourselves, whom we speak as we pass, or who 
have hoisted some signal, or floated to us some letter in a bottle 



FIGUEE8 COMPLETED BY THE EEADEE. 33 

from afar. But what know tLoy more than we ? They also found 
themselves on this wondrous sea. No; from the older sailors 
nothing. Over all their speaking-trumpets the gray sea and the 
lond winds answer — ^Not in us ; not in Time." 

The division of the Simile from the Metaphor is by no 
means a definite one. Between the one extreme in which 
the two elements of the comparison are detailed at full 
length and the analogy pointed out, and the other extreme 
in which the comparison is implied instead of stated, come 
intermediate forms, in which the comparison is partly 
stated and partly implied. For instance : 

^Astonished at the performances of the English 

plough, the ^pndoos paint it, set it up, and worship it ; 
thus turning a tool into an idol : linguists do the same 
with language. 

There is an evident advantage in leaving the reader or 
hearer to complete the figure. And generally these inter- 
mediate forms are good in proportion as they do this ; pro- 
vided the mode of completing it be obvious. 

Passing over much that may be said of Uke purport 
upon Hyperbole, Personification, Apostrophe, &c., let us 
close our remarks upon construction by a typical example, 
The general principle which has been enwciated is, that 
other things equal, the force of all verbal forms and ar- 
rangements is great, in proportion as the time and mental 
effort they demand from the recipient is small. The corol- 
laries from this general principle have been severally illus- 
trated ; and it has been shown tjiat the relative goodness 
of any two modes of expressing an idea, may be deter- 
mined by observing which requires the shortest process of 
thought for its comprehension. But though conformity 
in particular points has been exemplified, no cases of com 
plete conformity have yet been quoted. It is indeed diffi 
cult to find them ; for the English idiom does not com 



34 THE PHILOSOPHY OF 6TTLB. . 

monly permit the order whicK theory dictates. A few, 
however, occur in Ossian. Here is one : 

"As autumn's dark storms pour from two echoing hills, so 
towards each other approached the heroes. As two dark streams 
from high rocks meet and mix, and roar on the plain : loud, rough, 
and dark in battle meet Lochlin and Inisfail. * ''^ * As the 
troubled noise of the ocean when roll the waves on high ; as the 
last peal of the thunder of heaven ; such is noise of the battle." 

Except in the position of the verb in the first two sim- 
ilies, the theoretically best arrangement is fully carried 
out in each of these sentences. The simile comes before 
the qualified image, the adjectives before the substantives, 
the predicate and copula before the subject, -and their re- 
spective complements before them. That the passage is 
open to the charge of being bombastic proves nothing ; or 
rather, proves our case. For what is bombast but a force\ k 
of expression too great for the magnitude of the ideas em- II 
bodied ? All that may rightly be inferred is, that only in " 
very rare cases, and then only to produce a climax, should 
cdl the conditions of effective expression be fulfilled. 



III.— ARRANGEMENT OF MINOR IMAGES IN BUILDING UP 

A THOUGHT. 

Passing on to a more complex application of the doc- 
trine with which we set out, it must now be remarked, 
that not only in the structure of sentences, and the use 
of figures of speech, may economy of the recipient's men- 
tal energy be assigned as the cause of force ; but that in 
the choice and arrangement of the minor images, out of 
which some large thought is to be built up, we may trace 
the same condition to effect. To select from the senti^ 
ment, scene, or event described, those typical elements 
which carry many others along with them ; and so, by 



THE SBOEET OF "VTVID BiPSESSIONS. 



35 



saying a few things but suggesting many, to abridge the 
description ; is the secret of producing a vivid impression. 
An extract from Tennyson's "Mariana" will well illus- 
trate this : 

* All day within the dreamy house, 
The door upon the hinges creaked, 
The blue fly sung V the pane; the mouse 
Behind the mouldering wainscot shrieked, 
Or from the crevice peered about" 

The several circumstances here specified bring with 
them many appropriate associations. Our attention is 
rarely drawn by the buzzing of a fly in the window, save 
when every thing is stilL While the inmates are moving 
about Uie house, mice usually keep silence ; and it is only 
when extreme' quietness reigns that they peep from their 
retreats. Hence each of the facts mentioned, presuppos- 
ing numerous others, calls up these with more or less dis- 
tinctness ; and revives the feeling of dull solitude with 
which they are connected in our experience. Were 
all these facts detailed instead of suggested, the atten- 
tion would be so frittered, away that little impression of 
dreariness would be produced, Similarly in other cases. 
Whafever the nature of the thought to be conveyed, this 
skilful selection of a few particulars which imply the rest, 
is the key to success. In the choice of competent ideas, 
as in the choice of expre3sions, the aim must be to convey 
the greatest quantity of thoughts with the smallest quan- 
tity of words. 

The same principle may in some cases be advanta- 
geously carried yet further, by indirectly suggesting st>me 
entirely distinct thought in addition to the one expressed. 
Thus if we say,. 

^The head of a good classic is as full of ancient 

myths, as th^t of a servant-girl of ghost stories ; 

it is manifest that besides the fact asserted, there is an 



U-^ 



• 



36 THE PHILOSOPHY OF STYLE. 

implied opinion respecting the small value of classical 
knowledge: and «s this implied opinion is recognized 
much sooner than it can be put into words, there is gain 
in omitting it. In other cases, again, great effect is pro- 
duced by an overt omission ; provided the nature of the 
idea left out is obvious. A good instance of this occurs 
in " Heroes and Hero-worship." After describing the way 
in which Bums was sacrificed to the idle curiosity of 
Lion-hunters — ^people who came not out of sympathy but 
merely to see him — ^people who sought a little amusement, 
and who got their amusement while " the Hero's life went 
for it !" Carlyle suggests a parallel thus : 

" Richter says, in the Island of Sumatra there is a kind 
of * Light-chafers,' large Fire-flies, which people stick upon 
spits, and illuminate the ways with at night. Persons 
of condition can thus travel with a pleasant radiance, 
which they much admire. Great honour to the Fire-flies ! 
But— !— " 

IV.— THE SUPERIORITY OF POETRY TO PROSE EXPLAINED. 

Before inquiring whether the law of effect, thus far 
traced, explains the superiority of poetry to prose, it will 
be needful to notice some supplementary causes of force 
in expression, that have not yet been mentioned. These 
are not, properly speaking, additional causes ; but rather 
secondary ones, originating from those already specified — 
reflex results of them. In the first place, then, we may 
remark that i nental excitem ent spontaneously prompts the 
use of those forms of speech which have been pointed out 
as the most^ effective. " Out with him !" " Away with 
him !" are the natural utterances of angry ciuzens at a 
disturbed meeting. A voyager, describing -a terrible 
storm he had witnessed, would rise to some such climax 
as — " Crack went the ropes and down came the mast." 



• PECULIARITIES OF PASSIONATE LANGUAGE. 37 

Astonishment may be heard expressed in the phrase— 
" !Never was there such a sight I" All of which sentences 
are, it will be observed, constructed after the direct type. 
Again, every one knows that ex cited persons^are given to 
figures of speech. The vituperation of the vulgar abounds 
with them : often, indeed, consists of little else. " Beast," 
" brute," " gallows rogue," " cut-throat villain^" these, and 
other like metaphors and metaphorical epithets, at once 
call to mind a street quarrel. Further, it may be noticed 
that extreme brevity is another characteristic of passion- 
ate language. The sentences are generally incomplete ; 
the particles are omitted ; and frequently important words 
are left to be gathered from the context. Great, admira- 
tion does not vent itself in a precise proposition, as — " It 
is beautiful ;" but in the simple, exclamation,—^" Beauti- 
ful !" He who, when reading a lawyer's letter, should 
say, " Yile rascal 1" would be thought angry ; while, " Ho 
is a vile rascal," would imply comparative coolness. Thus 
we see that alike in the order ,of the words, in the fre- 
quent use of figures, and in extreme conciseness, the nat- 
ural utterances of excitement conform to the theoretical 
conditions of forcible expression. 

Hence, then, the higher forms of speech acquire a sec- 
ondary strength irom association. Having, in actual life, 
habitually heard them in connection with vivid mental 
impressions; and having been accustomed to meet with 
them in the most powerful writing ; they come to have in 
themselves a species of force. The emotions that have 
from time to time been produced by the strong thoughts 
wrapped up in these forms, are partially aroused by the 
forms themselves. They create a certain degree of anima- 
tion ; they induce a preparatory sympathy ; and when the 
striking ideas looked for are reached, they are the more 
vividly realized. 

The continuous use of these modes of expression that 



38 THE PHILOSOPHY OF STYLE. 

are alike forcible in themselyes and forcible from their 
associations, produces the peculiarly impressive species of 
composition which we call poetry. Poetry, we shall find, 
habitually adopts those symbols of thought, and those 
'methods of using them, which instinct and analysis agree 
in choosing as most effective ; and becomes poetry by vir- 
tue of doing this. On turning back to the various speci-^ 
mens that have been quoted, it will be seen that the direct 
or inverted form of sentence predominates in them ; and 
that to a degree quite inadmissible in prose. And not 
only in the frequency, but in what is termed the violence 
of the inversions, will this distinction be remarked. In 
the abundant use of figures, again, we may recognize the 
same truth. Metaphors, similes, hyperboles, and personi- 
fications, are the poet's colours, which he has liberty to 
employ almost without limit. We characterize as " poet-j 
ical " the prose which uses these appliances of language 
with any frequency; and condemn it as " over florid" of 
" affected " long before they occur with the profusion al- 
lowed in verse. Further, let it be remarked that in brev- 
ity — ^the other requisite of forcible expression which theory 
points out, and emotion spontaneously fulfils — ^poetical 
phraseology similarly differs fi:om ordinary phraseology. 
Imperfect periods are frequent ; elisions are perpetual ; and 
many of the minor words, which would be deemed essen- 
tial in prose, are dispensed with. ^ 

Thus poetry, /regarded as a vehicle of thought, iis espe- 
cially impressive partly because it obeys all the laws of 
effective speech, and partly because in so doing it imitates 
the natural utterances of excitement. While the matter I 
embodied is idealized emotion, the vehicle is th« idealized i 
language of emotion. As the musical composer catches 
the cadences in which our feelings of joy and sympathy, 
grief and desj)air^ vent themselves, and out of these germs 
evolves melodies suggesting higher phases of these feel- 



CHARAOTEEI8TIC8 OF RHYTHMICAL EXPRESSION, 39 

ings ; so, the poet developes from the typical expressions 
in which men utter passion and sentiment, those choice 
forms of verbal combination in which concentrated passion 
and sentiment may be fitly presented. 

There is one peculiarity of poetry conducing much to 
its effect — ^the peculiarity which is indeed usually thought 
its characteristic one — ^still remaining to be considered: 
we mean its rhythmicjal^fltnifliii^ This, improbable 
though it seems, will be found to come under the same 
generalization "with the others. Like each of them, it is 
an idealization of the natural language of strong emotion, 
which is known to be more or less metrical if the emotion 
be not too violent ; and like each of them it is an economy 
of the reader's or hearer's attention. In the peculiar tone 
and manner we adopt in uttering versified language, may 
be discerned its relationship to the feelings ; and the pleas- 
ure which its measured movement gives us, is ascribable 
to the comparative ease with which words metrically ar- 
ranged can be recognized. 

This last position will scarcely be at once admitted ; 
but a little explanation will show its reasonableness. For 
if, as we have seen, there is an expenditure of mental 
energy in the mere act of listening to verbal articulations, 
or in th^t silent repetition of them which goes on in readr 
ing — if the perceptive faculties must be in active exercise 
to identify every syllable — ^then, any n).odo of so com- 
.bining words as to present a regular recurrence of certain 
traits which the mind can anticipate, will diminish that 
strain upon the attention required by the total irregular- 
ity of prose. Just as the body, in receiving a series of 
varying concussions, must iKep the muscles ready to meet 
the most violeiit of them, as not knowing when such may 
come ; so, the mind in receiving unarranged articulations, 
must keep its perceptives active enough to recognize the 
least easily caught sounds. And as, if the concussions 



iO THE PHILOSOPHY OF STYLE. 

recur in a definite order, the body may husband its forces 
by adjusting the resistance needful for each concussion ; 
so, if the syllables be rhythmically arranged, the iipnd 
may economize its energies by anticipating the attention 
required for each syllable. 

Far-fetched though this idea will perhaps be thought, 
a little introspection will countenance it. That we do 
take advantage of metrical language to adjust our percep- 
tive faculties to the force of the expected ai*ticulations, is 
clear from the fact that we are balked by halting versifi- 
cation. Much as at the bottom of a flight of stairs, a step 
more or less than we counted upon gives us a shock ; so, 
too, does a misplaced accent or a supernumerary syllable. 
In the one case, we know that there is an erroneous pre- 
adjustment ; and we can scarcely doubt that there is one 
in the other. But if we habitually .preadjust our percep- 
tions to the measured, movement of verse, the physical 
analogy above given renders it probable that by so doinrj 
we economize attention ; and hence that metrical language 
is more effective than prose, because it enables us to do 
this. 

Were there space, it might be worth while to inquire 
whether the pleasure we take in rhyme, and also that 
which we take in euphony, are not partly ascribablo to 
the same general cause.* 

* See Note E, p. 6S. 






PART II. 

CAUSES OF FORGE IN LANGUAGE WBICH DEPEND UPON 
ECONOMY OF TEE MENTAL SENSIBILITIES, 

A few paragraphs only, can be devoted to a second 
division of our subject that here presents itself. To pur- 
sue in detail the laws of effect, as applying to the larger 
features of composition, would carry us beyond our lim- 
its. But we may briefly indicate a ftirther aspect of the 
general principle hitherto traced out, and hint a few of its 
wider applications. 

Thus far, then, we have considered only those causes 
of force in language which depend upon economy of the 
mental energies : we have now to glance at those which 
depend upon economy of the mental sensibilities. Ques- 
tionable though this division may be as a psychological 
oue, it will yet serve roughly to indicate the remaining 
field of investigation. It will suggest that besides consid- 
ering the extent to which any faculty or group of faculties 
is tasked in receiving a form of words and realizing its 
contained idea, we have to consider the state in which 
this faculty or group of faculties is left ; and how the 
reception of subsequent sentences and images will be influ 
encedby that state. Without going at length into 80 



i2 THE PniLOSOPnY OP STYLE. 

wide a topic ag the exercise of faculties and its reactive 
effects, it will be sufficient here to call to mind that every 
faculty (when in a state of normal activity) is most capa- 
ble at the outset ; and that the change in its condition, 
which ends in what we term exhaustion, begins simulta- 
neously with its exercise. This generalization, with which 
we are all femiliar in our bodily experiences, and which 
our daily language recognizes as true of the mind as a 
whole, is equally true of each mental power, from the 
simplest of the senses to the most complex of the senti- 
ments. If we hold a flower to the nose for long, we be- 
come insensible to its scent. We say of a very brilliant 
flash of lightning that it blinds us ; which means that our 
eyes have for a time lost their ability to appreciate light. 
After eating a quantity of honey, we are apt to think our ■ 
tea is without sugar. The phrase " a deafening roar," im- 
plies that men find a very loud sound temporarily incapa- 
citates them for hearing faint ones. To a hand which has i 
for some time carried a heavy body, small bodies after- 
wards lifted seem to have lost their weight. Now, the 
truth at once recognized in these, its extreme manifesta- 
tions, may be traced throughout. It may be shown that 
alike in the reflective faculties, in the imagination, in the 
perceptions of the beautiful, the ludicrous, the sublime, in 
the sentiments, the instincts, in all the mental powers, 
however we may classify them-r-action exhausts ; and^hat 
in proportion as the action is violent, the subsequent pros- 
tration is great. 

Equally, throughout the whole nature, may be traced 
the law that exercised faculties are ever tending to resume 
their original state. Not only after continued rest, do 
they regain their full power — ^not only do brief cessations 
partially reinvigorate them ; but even while they are in 
action, the resulting exhaustion isi, ever being neutralized. 
The two processes of waste and repair go on together. 



EXPLANATION OP CLIMAX. 43 

Hence with faculties habitually exercised — as the senses 
of all persons, or the muscles of any one who is strong — 
it happens that, during moderate activity, the repair is so 
nearly equal to the waste, that the diminution of power is 
scarcely appreciable ; and it is only when the activity has 
been long continued, or has been very violent, that the 
repair becomes so far in arrear of the waste as to produce 
a perceptible prostration. In all cases, however, when, 
by the action of a faculty, waste has been incurred, some 
/apse of time must take place before full efficiency can be 
reacquired ; and this time must be long in proportion as 
the waste has been great. 

Keeping in mind these general truths, we shall be in a 
condition to imderstand certain causes of effect in compo- 
sition now to be considered. Every perception received, 
and every conception realized, entailing some amount of 
waste — or, as Liebig would say, some change of matter in 
the brain ; and the efficiency of the faculties subject to 
this waste being thereby temporarily, though often but 
momentarily, diminished; the resulting partial inability 
must affect the acts of perception and conception that im- 
mediately succeed. And hence we may expect that the 
vividness with which images are realized will, in many 
cases, depend on the order of their presentation : even 
when one order is as convenient to the understanding as 
the other. 

There are sundry facts which alike illustrate this, and 
are explained by it. Climax is one of them. The marked 
effect obtained by placing last the most striking of any 
series of images, and the weakness — often the ludicrous 
weakness — ^produced by reversing this arrangement, de- 
pends on the general law indicated. As immediately after 
looking at the sun we cannot perceive the light of a fire, 
while by looking at the fire first and the sun afterwards 
we can perceive both ; so, after receiving a brilliant, or 



44 THE PHILOSOPHT OF STYLE. 

weighty, or terrible thought, we cannot appreciate a less 
brilliant, less weighty, or less terrible one, while, by re- 
versing the order, we can appreciate each. In Antithesis, 
again, we may recognize the same general truth. The 
opposition of two thoughts that are the reverse of each 
other in some prominent trait, insures an impressive eSect ; 
and does this by giving a momentary relaxation to the 
faculties addressed. If, after a series of images of an ordi- 
nary character, appealing in a moderate degree to the 
sentiment of reverence, or approbation, or beauty, the 
mind has presented to it a very insignificant, a very un- 
worthy, or a veiy ugly image ; the faculty of reverence, 
or approbation, or beauty, as the case may be, having for 
the time nothing to do, tends to resume its full power; and 
will immediately afterwards appreciate a vast, admirable, 
or beautiful image better than it would otherwise do. 
Conversely, where the idea of absurdity due to extreme 
insignificance is to be produced, it may be greatly intensi- 
^ fied by placing it after something highly impressive : espe- 
! cially if the form of phrase implies that something still 
* more impressive is coming. A good illustration of the 
effect gained by thus presenting a petty idea to a con- 
sciousness that has not yet recovered from the shock of 
an exciting one, occurs in a sketch by Balzac. His hero 
writes to a mistress who has cooled towards him, the fol- 
lowing letter : 

"Madame, — ^Votre conduite m'6tonne autant qd'elle 
m'afflige. Non contente de mo d6chirer le ccBur par vos 
dedains, vous avez Pind^licatesse de me retenir une brosse 
h dents, que mes moyens ne me permettent pas de rempla- 
cer, mes propriet^s 6tant grev^es d'hypoth5ques. 

" Adieu, trop belle et trop ingrate amie ! Puissiona- 
Dous nous revoir dans un monde meilleur ! 

" Ciiaisiles-Edouaed.*' 
Thus we see that the phenomena of Climax, Antithesis, 



GENITBAL PRINCIPLE OF ECONOMY. 45 

and AnticKmax, alike result from this general principle. 
Improbable as these momentary variations in susceptibil- 
ity may seem, we cannot doubt their occun'ence when we 
contemplate the analogous variations in the susceptibility 
of the senses. Referring once more to phenomena of vis- 
ion, every one knows that a patch of black on a white 
ground looks blacker, and a patch of white on a black 
ground looks whiter, than elsewhere. As the blackness 
and the whiteness must really be the same, the only assign- 
able cause for this, is a difference in their actions upon us, 
dependent upon the different states of our faculties. It is 
simply a visual antithesis. 

But this extension of the general principle of economy 
— ^this ftirther condition to effective composition, that the 
sensitiveness of the faculties must be continuously hus- 
banded — ^includes much more than has been yet hinted. 
It implies not only that certain arrangements and certain 
juxtapositions of connected ideas are best ; but that some 
modes of dividing and presenting a subject will be more 
striking than others ; and that, too, irrespective of its log- 
ical cohesion. It shows why we must pro gress f rom the 
less in teresting to the more interesting ; and why not only 
the composition as a whole, but each of its successive por- 
tions, should tend towards a climax. At the same time, 
it forbids long continuity of the same kind of thought, or 
repeated production of like effects. It warns us against 
the error committed both by Pope in his poems and by 
Bacon in his essays — ^the error, namely, of constantly em- 
ploying forcible forms of expression: and it points out 
tEaTas the easiest posture by and by becomes fatiguing, 
and is with pleasure exchanged for one less easy ; so, the 
most perfectly-constructed sentences will soon weary, and 
relief will be given by using those of an inferior kind. 

Further, we may infer from it not only that should we 
avoid generally combining our words in one manner, how- 



A6 THE PHILOSOPHY OF STfLE. 

ever good, or working out our figures and illustrations in 
one way, however telling ; "but that we should avoid any- 
thing jikejayaiform adherence, even to the wider conditions 
of effect. We should not make every section of our sub- 
ject progress in interest ; we should not always rise to a 
climax. As we saw that, in single sentences, it is but 
rarely allowable to fiilfil all the conditions to strength ; 
so, in the larger sections of a composition we must not 
often conform entirely to the law indicated. We must 
subordinate the component effect to the total effect.* 

In deciding how practically to carry out the principles 
of artistic composition, w.e may derive help by bearing in 
mind a fact already pointed out — ^the fitness of certain 
verbal arrangements for certain kinds of thought. That 
constant variety in the mode' of presenting ideas which 
the theory demands, will in a great degree result from a 
skilful adaptation of the form to the matter. We saw 
how the direct or inverted sentence is spontaneously used 
by excited people ; and how their language ip also charao- 
terized by figures of speech and by extreme brevity. 
Hence these may with advantage predominate in emo- 
tional passages; and may increase as the emotion rises. 
On the other hand, for complex ideas, the indirect sen- 
tence seems the best vehicle. In conversation, the excite- 
ment produced by the near approach to a desired conclu- 
sion, will often show itself in a series of short, sharp sen- 
tences ; while, in impressing a view already enunciated, 
we generally make our periods voluminous by piling 
thought upon thought. These natural modes of procedure 
may serve as guides in writing. Keen observation and 
skilful analysis would, in like manner, detect further pecu- 
liarities of expression produced by other attitudes^of mindj 
and by paying due attention to all such traits, a writer 
possessed of sufficient versatility might make some ap- 
proach to a completely-organized work. 

• 8«o Note F, p. 51 



STYLE VAEIES WITH STATES OF FEELING. 47 

This species of composition which the law of effect 
points out as the perfect one, is the one which high genius 
tends naturally to produce. As we found that the kinds 
of sentence which are theoretically best, are those gener- 
ally employed by superior minds, and by inferior minds 
when excitement has raised them ; so, we shall find that 
the ideal form for a poem, essay, or fiction, is that which 
the ideal writer would evolve spontaneously. One in 
whom the powers of expression fully responded to the 
state of feeling, would unconsciously use that variety in 
the mode of presenting his thoughts, which Art demands. 
This constant employment of one species of phraseology, 
which ^11 have now to strive against, implies an undevel- 
oped faculty of language. To have a specific style is to 
be poor in speech. K we remember that in the fax past, 
men had only nouns and verbs to convey their ideas with, 
and that from then to now the growth has been towards 
a greater number of implements of thought, and conse- 
quently towards a greater complexity and variety in their 
combinations ; we may infer that we are now, in our use 
of sentences, much what the primitive man was in his use 
of words ; and that a continuance of the process that has 
hitherto gone on, must produce increasing heterogeneity 
in our modes of expression. As now, in a fine nature, the 
play of the features, the tones of the voice and its ca- 
dences, vary in harmony with every thought uttered ; so, 
in one possessed of a fully-developed power of speech, the 
mould in which each combination of words is cast wUl 
similarly vary with, and be appropriate to the sentiment. 

That a perfectly-endowed man must unconsciously 
write in all styles, we may infer from considering how 
styles originate. Why is Johnson pompous, Goldsmith 
simple ? Why is one author abrupt, another rhythmical, 
another concise? Evidently in each case the habitual 
mode of utterance must depend upon the habitual balance 



48 THE PHILOSOPHY OF STYLE. 

of tlie nature. The predominant feelings have by use 
trained the intellect to represent them. But while long, 
though unconscious, discipline has made it do this effi- 
ciently, it remains, from lack of practice, incapable of 
doing the same for the less active feelings; and when 
these are excited, the usual verbal forms undergo but 
slight modifications. Let the powers of speech be fully 
developed, however — let the ability of the intellect to 
utter the emotions be complete ; apd this fixity of style 
will disappear. The perfect writer will express himself 
as Junius, when in the Junius frame of mmd ; when he 
feels as Lamb felt, will use a like familiar speech ; and will 
fall into the ruggedness of Carlyle when in a Carlylean 
mood. Now he will be rhythmical and now irregular; 
here his language will be plain and there ornate ; some- 
times his sentences will be balanced and at other times 
unsymmetrical ; for a while there will be considerable 
sameness, and then again great variety. His mode of 
expression naturally responding to his state of feeling, 
there will flow from his pen a composition changing to 
the same degree that the aspects of his subject change. 
He will thus without effort conform to what we have seen 
to be the laws of effect. And while his work presents to 
the reader that variety needful, to prevent continuous 
exertion of the same faculties, it will also answer to the 
description of all highly-organized products, both of man 
and of nature : it will be, not a series of like parts simply 
placed in juxtaposition, but one whole made up of unlike 
parts that are mutually dependent.* 

• See Note (>, p. 64. 



KOTES. 



A.— IDIOMATIC EXPRESSIONS. 

What the author says on the apprehension of Anglo-Saxon 
words, applies with equal force to idiomatic expressions. Aris- 
ing as they do from the peculiar genius of a people and its lan- 
guage ; being, therefore, part and parcel of its way of thinking, 
their use, far from entailing any loss of mental energy, on the 
contrary, expedites the communication of thought. It is a spuri- 
ous taste that condemns them as inelegant. In no sense can they 
be considered vulgar. Our most vigorous writers never shrink 
from them. Craik calls them,- and rightly so, '* the radical fibres 
of a national speech."* Walter Savage Landor says of them : 
«' Every good writer has much idiom ; it is the life and spirit of 
language ; and none ever entertained a fear or apprehension that 
strength and sublimity were to be lowered by it." Young writers 
are prone to reject the idioms of their mother-tongue, and fre- 
quently prefer to gather up that scum of foreign phrases that 
floats so abundantly upon the surface of bad composition and de- 
generate language. No better author can be recommended for 
the study of pure English idioms than John Henry Newmau, who 
is universally acknowledged the greatest master of prose living. 
Tennyson and William Morris make use of the Anglo-Saxon ele- 
ment almost exclusively in their poems; their popularity tells well 
for the public taste, and indicates the vein in which an author 
must work to achieve permanent success. 

B.— PARTICULARS IN THOUGHT. 

* 

However effective may be the power of generalization for the 

philosopher and the mere scientific man, he who aspires to pro- 
3 



50 NOTES. 

duce effect in literature, properly so called, must deal in distinct 
realities. " All things in tlie exterior world," says a celebrated 
writer, " are unit and individual, and are nothing else." Search the 
whole domain of literature, and you will invariably find* that au* 
thors are popular in proportion to their power of particularizing. 
The characters they delineate are traced with such discrimina- 
tion that there is no mistaking one for another ; the scenes they 
describe are pencilled in particulars ; the details they enter into 
are all individual incidents grouped together with a master's 
hand. It is a happy selection of individual scenes and incidents 
— a power of using felicitous words to express particular things — 
that raises the little fishing-book of the gentle and genial linen- 
draper, Izaao Walton, to the dignity of a classic, and makes of 
Addison's Spectator a better exponent of the age of Queen Anne 
than any history extant. And it is the absence of all this that 
characterizes the undisciplined writer and his indigested produc- 
tions — ^the type of much that is written in these times. It is 
far easier to sail in the smooth regions of the possible, than to 
pilot one's way through the rocks and shoals of actuality ; and 
yet the latter is the only course that leads to the haven of suc- 
cess. If the literary novice would avoid the vagueness and in- 
definiteness so prevalent in the literature of the day, let him cul- 
tivate a spirit of close observation of men and things, and study 
to obtain fixity of opinion on the topics with which he deals — 
taking care that, in steering clear of Charybdis, he strikes not 
upon Scylla ; in other words, that he be not more occupied with 
what he has to do than with what he does, which course Goethe 
somewhere calls.^^ thinking about thinking," a practice calculated 
to absorb his best energies to no purpose. 



C— LABYKINTHINE SENTENCES. 

A great expenditure of mental energy accompanies the un- 
ravelling of long and labored sentences, and it not unfrequently 
happens that the result but tallies ill witluthe pains taken. "A 
sentence, for example," says De Quincey, " begins with a series 
of ifi; perhaps a dozen lines are occupied with expanding the 



NOTES. 51 

conditidns under wluch something is affirmed or denied; hero 
yen cannot dismiss and have done with the ideas as you go along; 
all is hypothetic; all is snspended in air. The conditions are 
not folly to be nnderstood nntil yon are acquainted with the de- 
pendency ; you must give a separate attention to each clause of 
this complex hypothesis, and yet, having done tJi^at by a painful 
effort, you have done nothing at all ; for you must exercise a re- 
acting attention through the corresponding latter section, in or- 
der to follow out its relations to all parts of the hypothesis which 
sustained it. In fact, under the rude yet also artificial charac- 
ter of newspaper style, each separate monster period is a vast 
arch, which, not receiving its keystone, not being locked into 
self-supporting cohesion until you nearly reach its close, imposes 
of necessity upon the unhappy reader all the ontta of its ponder- 
ous weight through the main process of itd construction." The 
natural style — the style in which a writer speaks as he thinks 
and feels, and which depends on his temperament and the na- 
ture of his subject — ought to be the aim of the literary aspirant. 
It is free from the labyrinthine complexities here alluded to, 
and entails a minimum waste of brain, so that ^' he who runs 
may read." It pleases all. " When we meet with the natural 
style," says Pascal, "we are highly delighted, because we ex- 
pected to see an author, and we find a man." 



D.— THE OKIGIN OF rTflJTT? A TTYE LANGUAGE. 

To ask if there existed a time in the history of man when fig- 
urative language was not used, is to ask if a time was when the 
sensitive part of AsjD^a nature was steeled to all impression, his 
soul was frozen to^& depths, and his imagination was paralyzed 
in its creative efforts — a condition of things which sound philoso- 
phy and the history of literature hold incompatible with the ex- 
istence of man as a free agent in life : sound philosophy, because 
man, as a living organism, being twofold in essence, must live in 
accordance with the laws of his nature; the history of literature, 
because the higher we ascend the stream of tradition the clearer' 
and louder is the divine origin of man proclaimed by the sacred 



52 NOTES. 

books of primitivo nations, and thorefore his faculties must have 
been as free and active as they are to-day. And such is the ten- 
dency to which the earliest records point — whether we consider 
them in art, poetry, architecture, or mythology ; all are eloquent 
though mute witnesses of the creations of the imagination, the 
faculty most active in forming figurative expressions. To the 
spontaneous outpourings of his imagination, rendered active by the 
present attunement of his physical organism, ale we to attribute 
the frequent use of figurative language by man, and not, as some 
would have us believe, to the fact of l^is being driven to it by 
any necessity al> extra. 

Let us dwell a moment upon the present attunement of man's 
organism. Science teaches that color, with all its varied hues 
and tints, resides not in the object colored — that it is no other 
than ethereal vibrations of certain definite lengths — ^that these 
vibrations are set in motion by the swing to and fro of the ulti- 
mate particles of the matter of which a lighted body is composed, 
as the sun, for example — ^that the bodies against which they 
strike are so constituted as to absorb some and reflect others — 
finally, that man's optic nerves are attuned to synchronize with 
the vibrations reflected, and the phenomenon of seeing such or 
such a color results. It follows that if Beauty hath her habita* 
tion in our universe, living in the setting sun, or in *' eve's on^ 
star," or sitting on the rainbow that spans the heavens, or walk- 
ing over green fields and tree-clad hills, or wading through the 
running brook— 

** Making sweet music with the enamelled stones^— 

if she dwelleth in the lily's cup or is mantled in the iris-hued miso 
that presides over the cataract's roar, or floateth on the fragrant air 
— she doth so because man is. Truly and without affectation can 
we here exclaim with the poet : *' What a piece of work is man ! 
how noble in reason 1 how infinite in faculty I in apprehension 
how like a god I " Beware of making him a self-educated brute. 
Kemember that the savage is not a type of the primitive man ; 
for barbarism is the old age of society. Language is not the in- 
vention of yesterday ; it is one of the most precious heirlooms 
bestowed by the Divinity at the moment of creation. " In pririr- 
(jtpio.erat verbum" — ^in the beginning was the Word. &-4Jie 



i 



NOTES, 53 

beginning too did Fancy sit at tho feet of Reason, delighting him 
by the fragrance of these beautiful bouquets of speech, called fig- 
urative language, wherewith she presented him to adorn the no- 
blest productions of the human mind. 



E.— WHY POETRY PLEASES. 

What the author says of poetry is true as far as its mechanism 
is concerned ; but we must look deeper than the rhythm and ca- 
dence of verse for the true source of the pleasure it gives. We 
must study the vital principle of which these are the embodi- 
ment. We all of us are of opinion that the poet's faculty is a 
something thrown in over and above the ordinary gifts bestowed 
upon man by the lavish hand of Nature — " poeta nascitur." It 
is a species of instinct — of a higher order than any thing in tho 
brute creation, but still an instinct — ^by which the poet, often 
without knowing the why or wherefore of what he does, throws 
off those grand strains in which the harmonies of the universe 
are sung or "high actions and high passions" are described. 
ISTow, we do not agree with the Hindoo sagas when they say that 
the Supreme Being does things through sport ; we believe in 
the eternal fitness of things created by Divine Wisdom ; and 
therefore we are convinced that the poet haa, a lieavenly mis- 
siQjLtojtecGQxm, even as the prophet of old, if he be only faithful 
to his calling. And we can read this mission in the fact that, 
while science and art lie buried beneath the ruins of crumbled 
civilizations, poetry lives on from age to age, enshrined in man's 
heart. It pleases, because it satisfies some wants of his nattrre. 
It interprets those low and vague whisperings that -sweep 
through the depths of his soul ; it puts in words the silent yearn- 
ings of his heart ; it gives a hue and tint to the beauties of 
earth more lasting than aught the painter's brush can impart ; it 
brings from afar reminiscences of a by-gone bliss ; it lifts a comer 
of the veil that hides the secrets of ITature, and gives him a glimpse 
of other worlds and another order of things. 



64 NOTES. 



F.— SOUND CRITICISM. 

Longinus, in the twenty-third chapter of his little treatise on 
the Suhlime, has a passage which may be aptly quoted as a com- 
mentary to what our author gives. ** It is with discourses," he 
says, "as with bodies, which ordinarily owe their principal excel- 
lence to the assemblage and just proportion of their members, in 
such a way that although one member, separated from the others, 
may have nothing remarkable about it, still all of them together 
do not fail to make a perfect body." We cannot infer from a 
fragment of a composition what the whole is, any more than 
we could describe Babylon from specimens of the bricks used in 
its construction. This is a principle which sound criticism holds 
fast to, in pronouncing its judgments on authors and books. 
Hence the caution with which quotations are to be received 
when brought to bear on critical points of history ; for, torn from 
the context, they may be interpreted in the most opposite ways, 
according to the bias of the writer. Whenever it is in our 
power, we ought to refer to the original and authentic docu- 
ments, if we would have more than mere coiyectural or doubtfol 
knowledge on facts that often intimately concern the individual, 
as, for example, in the case of religious controversy, so much of 
which hangs upon quotations. 

■ 

G.— SPECIFIC STYLE. 

In all literature we have but one instance of this perfect ver- 
satility in style — ^the writings of the myriad-minded Shakespeare. 
There every character has its own peculiar way of speaking;. 
. . no two converse in exactly the same tone. Witness the hollow 
vf* stateliness of the hypocritical king in "Hamlet; " the euphuistic 
^5 ^ word-play of the cr afty Pol onius ; the rustic humor of the grave- 
diggd^s; and the grancl, Natural outpourings of ^amlet^s noble 
S^ soul, fierce as the whirlwind when soliloquizingf-gentle as the 
dew of heaven when with the friend he wears in his " heart of 
hearts ; " the true Horatio — every word two-edged and striking 
v^ home with giant force when dealing with his masked enemies in 
moments of assumed lunacy. But Shakespeare is an exception. 



>-.. 

-^ 



\ 







NOTES. 68 

Althongli the author is theoretically correct, we see no tendency 
toward the practicahility of his views. Nations in all stages of 
their existence have had their characteristic styles, even as they 
ever retained through all their social changes the features that 
marked their individuality. Thus we speak to-day of the German 
style, the French style, or the English style — each one giving rise 
to ideas distinct in proportion to our acquaintance with the liter- 
atures of these nations. As memhers of the same family have 
common traits of character, so writers of the same period have a 
certain family likeness in their productions, all of which striking- 
ly reflect the spirit of their age. "No great critical acumen is re- 
quired to distinguish between a poem written in. the Elizabethan 
age and one composed in the time of Queen Anne ; and the ob- 
jectiveness with which ancient literature is so thoroughly imbued 
can never be confounded with the eminently subjective character 
of modem productions. What is true of nations and periods is 
true of individuals. Besides the common traits of their period, 
and the more general outlines of their nation, they have individ- 
ual peculiarities that brand their style as theirs, and theirs alone. 
These peculiarities are the impress of their individual natures ; 
they are the hieroglyphics in which their characters are in- 
scribed ; and though we may not be able to infer irhat a man is 
from what he says, still, in his style, if we only read it aright, 
we can decipher his character. . " L^t^e^JesMJhomme." 

Laying hold of the fact that the'wiBng^nndividuSs in- 
variably bear the stamp of the age in which they live, we have 
a safe countercheck against the misrepresentations of prejudiced 
or misguided historians. We can learn more of a period from a 
ballad that was then popular, than we can from the best and 
most impartial description of the historian; because in the 
ballad we are inhaling the atmosphere which those of that period 
breathed, and are in a position to form a correct idea of how 
they felt. 



WOEES OF HEKBERT SPENCER. 

PUBLISHID BT 

D A.PPLETO]Sr AND COMPANY. 

SYSTEM OF PHILOSOPHY 

I.— FIRST PRINCIPLES. 

{New and Erdarged Edition,) 

Pai) f.'— The Unknowable. 

Pa«\ n.— Laws of the Knowable. 

159 pages. Price, ...•-.- • |S.iO 

XL— THE PRINCIPLES OP BIOLOGY.— VOL. L 

Pjti I. — ^The Data or Bioloot. 
Part II. — ^The Inductions of Biology. 
Part IIL — ^The Evolution of Life, 

475 pages. Price, • - -- - - •• $2.60 

PRINCIPLES OP BIOLOGY.— VOL. IL 

Part IV. — ^Morphologioal Deyxlopment. 
Part V. — ^Physiological Betelophent. 
Part VI. — ^Laws of Multiplication. 

565 pages. Price, $2.50 

ni.— THE PRINCIPLES OP PSYCHOLOGY. 

Part L-^The Data of Psychology. 144 pages. Price, - - |0.7S 

Part II. — ^The Inductions of Psychology. . 146 pages. Price, • 10.76 

Part HI. — General Synthesis. 100 pages. > p . #i nn 

Part IV.— Special Synthesis. 112 pages. J^nce, • - fl.00 



■^ • 



MISCELLANEOUS. 

I.— ILLUSTRATIONS OF UNIVERSAL PROGRESS. 
Thirixen Articles. 461 pages. Price, • • • • • $2.60 

n.— ESSAYS : 

Moral, Political, and JSsthetic. 

Tin Essays. 886 pages. Pricey $2.60 

ia--SOCIAL STATICS: 

Or nn Conditions Essential to Human Happiness Spbcified, and hie 

First of them Dsyelopbd. 
618 pages. Price, $2.60 

IV.— EDUCATION : 

Inteilectual, Moral, and Physical. 
t88 pages. Price, $1.26 

v.— CLASSIFICATION OP THE SCIENCES. 
90 pages. Price, ... . .... $0.20 

VI.— SPONTANEOUS GENERATION, &c. 
16 pages. Price, . . * • • , $0.26 



THE DESCENT OF MAN. 

The JDescerU of Man, 

AND SELECTION IN RELATION TO SEX. By Charles Dar. 
WIN, K. A., F. R. S., etc. With Illugtrations, 2 yoIs., 12mo. Cloth. 
Price, 12.00 per vol. 

Oriffin of Species by Means of Natural SeiecHon; 

Or, the Presenration of Favored Races in the Straggle for Life. Nen 
and revised edition. By Chables Darwin, M. A., F. R. S., F, 6. Sb, 
etc. With copious Index. 1 vol., 12mo. Cloth. Price, |2.00 I 

ST. a-s:oi^GMc MIV^AJIT. ! 

On the Genesis of Species, 

By St. Gxohgi Mitart, F.R.S. 12mo, 916 pages, nicstnited. 
Cloth. Price, $1.76. 

SFKNCER. 

The Principles of Biology. 

By Hjerbert Spenckr. 2 vols. $S.CO. 

HTrX3:.KY. 

Man'^s Place in Nature* 

By Thoicas H. Huzlet, LL.D., F.R.S. 1 vol., 12moL Cloth. 
Price, $1.26. n 

On the Origin of Species. 

By Thoicas H. Hitzlst, LL. D., F. R. S. 1 vol, 12mo. Cloth. l*rice, %U 

Hereditary Genius: 

An Inquiry into its Laws and Consequences. By Franco) Galtov 
New revised edition. 12mo. Cloth. Price, $2.00. 

B'lGrTJTEjR. 

Primitive Man* 

Illustrated with thirty Scenes of Primitive Life, and 283 Figures of 
Objects belonging to Prehistoric Ages. By Louis Fiouibr, author 
of." The Worid before the Deluge," " The Ocean Worid," etc. 1 
vol., 8vo. Cloth. Price, $4.00. 

liXJBBOCB:. 

Origin of CfivUization^ 

AND THE PRIMITIVE CONDITION OP MAN. By Sir JoD 
Lubbock, Bart, M. P. 1 vol., 12mo. Cloth. Priee $2.00. 



Either of the above mailed to any address within the United States, 
teoeipt of price. 

D. APPLETON & CO., Publishers, 

Ko8. 649 k 661 BBOABWAY, K. T. 



THE ORIGIN OF OIVILEATION; 

OB, THK 

PRIMITIVE OONDITIOir OF MANl 
By SIB JOHN LUBBOCK, Bart, K. P^ F. B. & 

380 iPages. lU-astrated. 

This interesting work is the fruit of many years' research 
by an accomplished naturalist, and one well trained in mod- 
am scientific methods, into the mental,*moral, and social con- 
dition of the lowest savage races. The want of a work of 
this kind had long been felt, and, as scientific methods are 
being more and more applied to questions of humanity, there 
has been increasing need of a careful and authentic work de- 
scribing the conditions of those tribes of men who are lowest 
in the scale of development. 

" This interesting work — ^for it is intensely so in its aim, scope, and tho 
ability of its author — ^treats of what the scientists denominate anthropology^ 
or the natural history of the human species ; the complete science of man, 
body and soul, including sex, temperament, race, civilization, etc." — JProvi' 
dence Frets. 

" A work which is most comprehensiye in its lum,* and most admirable in 
its execution. The patience and judgment bestowed on the book are every- 
where apparent ;. the mere list of authorities quoted giving evidence of wide 
and impartial reading. The work, indeed,* is not only a valuable one on ac- 
count of the opinions it expresses, but it is also most serviceable as a book 
of reference. It offers an able and exhaustive table of a vast array of facts, 
which no single student could well obtain for himself^ and it has not been 
made the vehicle for any special pleading on the part of the author."-— 
landon AihcMBian, 

^ The book is no cursory and superficial review ; it go^ to the very heart 
of the subject, and 'embodies the results of all the later investigations. It ii 
replete with curious and quaint information presented in a compact, luminona, 
■nd entertaining form." — Albany Mjening Jowmal, 

^ The treatment of the subject is eminently practical, dealing more witli 
fiMi than theory, or perhaps it will be more just to say, dealing only witk 
thieory amply sustained by fact." — Detroit Free Frese, 

^ This interesting and valuable volume illustrates, to some extent, tbt 
way in which the modem scientific spirit manages to extract a considerAblt 
treasure from the chaff and refuse neglected or thrown aside by formei ip 
Ittirers." — London Saturday JReview. 

D. APPLETON & CO.. Publishers. 



2>. Jppleton <fi Company'' 8 Publieatwri^, 

LAY SEEMOI^S, 
ADDEESSES, AND EEVIEWS, 

Bt THOlLiS HENRY HUXLET. 

dathf ISmo. 890 pagoi* Mm, $1.76 

This is the latest and most popular of the works of this in- 
Irepid and accomplished English thinker. The American edition 
of the work is the latest, and contains, in addition to the English 
edition, Professor Hmxley's recent masterlj address on ^^ Spon- 
taneous Generation," delivered before the British Association for 
the Advancement of Science, of which he was i>resident. 

The following is from an able article in the Ind^endent : 

The " Lay Sermons, Addresses, and Reviews " Is a book to be read 
by every one who would keep up with the advance ef truth — as well by 
those who are hostile as those who are friendly to his conclusions. In 
it, scientific and philosophical topics are handled with consummate abil- 
ity. It is remarkable for purity of style and power of expression. No- 
where, in any modem work^ is the advancement of the pursuit of that 
natural knowledge, which is of vital importance to bodily and mental 
well-being, so ably handled. 

Professor Huxley is undoubtedly the representative scientific man of 
the age. His reverence for the right and devotion to truth have estab^ 
V fished his leadership of modem scientific thought. He leads the behefii 
\and aspirations of the increasin^y powerful body of the younger men of 
^ence. His ability for research is marvellous. There is possible no mora 
^uipoise of judgment than that to which he brings the phenomena of 
Nature. Besides, he is not a mere scientist. His is a popularized phi» 
losophy ; social questions have been treated by his pen in a manner most 
masterly. In his popular addresses, embracing the widest range of top> 
icB, he treads on ground with which he seems thoroughly familiar. 

There are those who hold the name of Professor Huxley as synonyo 
mous with irreverence and atheism. Plato's was so held, and Galileo's, 
and Descartes's, a^nd Newton's, and Faraday's. There can be no greater 
mistake. No man has greater reverence for the Bible than Huxley. No 
one more acquaintance with the text of Scripture. He believes there is 
definite government of the universe ; that pleasures and pains are distrib- 
uted in accordance with law ; and that the certain proportion of evil 
woven up in the life even of worms will help the man who thinks to bear 
his own share with courage. 

In the estimate of Professor Huxley's future influence upon science, 
his youth and health form a large element. He has just passed his forty- 
fifth year. If God spare his life^ tru^h can hardly fail to be the gainer 
from a mind that is stored with knowledge of the laws of the Creator's 
operations, and that has Icarped to love aQ beauty and hate ail vilenets of 
Nature and art. 



t 



*yJ. 



X 



1* 




Vv 



»i»*t' *'■ 



\ 



This book should be returned to the 
Library on or before the last date stamped 
below. 

A fine of five cents a day is.incurred bj 
retaining it beyond the specified time. 

Please return promptly^^\|F 



m 



„r-r- -•*: "^^ 



0Ut''5C-4''»l» 








140X8 '63 H 



